Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2830
Patient counseling, defined.

Patient counseling means the verbal communication by a pharmacist, pharmacist intern, or practitioner, in a manner reflecting dignity and the right of the patient to a reasonable degree of privacy, of information to the patient or caregiver in order to improve therapeutic outcomes by maximizing proper use of prescription drugs and devices and also includes the duties set out in section 38-2869.

Laws 2007, LB463, § 926.